Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.015

Livestock identification advisory committee—Rule review—Fee setting. (Effective until July 1, 2026.)

(1) The director shall establish a livestock identification advisory committee. The committee shall be composed of 12 voting members appointed by the director as follows: Two beef producers, two cattle feeders, two dairy producers, two livestock market owners, two meat processors, and two horse producers. Organizations representing the groups represented on the committee may submit nominations for these appointments to the director for the director's consideration. No more than two members at the time of their appointment or during their term may reside in the same county. Members may be reappointed and vacancies must be filled in the same manner as original appointments are made. As used in this subsection, "meat processor" means a person licensed to operate a slaughtering establishment under chapter 16.49 RCW or the federal meat inspection act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.). In making appointments, the director shall solicit nominations from organizations representing these groups statewide. The committee shall elect a member to serve as chair of the committee. The committee must meet at least twice a year. The committee shall meet at the call of the director, chair, or a majority of the committee. A quorum of the committee consists of a majority of members. If a member has not been designated for a position set forth in this section, that position may not be counted for purposes of determining a quorum. A member may appoint an alternate who meets the same qualifications as the member to serve during the member's absence. The director may remove a member from the committee if that member has two or more unexcused absences during a single calendar year.

(2) The purpose of the committee is to provide advice to the director regarding livestock identification programs administered under this chapter and regarding inspection fees and related licensing fees. The advisory committee must review the costs and operations of the livestock identification program. The director shall consult the committee before adopting, amending, or repealing a rule under this chapter or altering a fee under RCW 16.58.050, 16.65.030, 16.65.037, or 16.65.090. If the director publishes in the Washington State Register a proposed rule to be adopted under the authority of this chapter and the rule has not received the approval of the advisory committee, the director shall file with the committee a written statement setting forth the director's reasons for proposing the rule without the committee's approval.

(3) The members of the advisory committee serve three-year terms. However, the director shall by rule provide shorter initial terms for some of the members of the committee to stagger the expiration of the initial terms. The members serve without compensation. The director may authorize the expenses of a member to be reimbursed if the member is selected to attend a regional or national conference or meeting regarding livestock identification. Any such reimbursement shall be in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2023 c 46 s 1; 2019 c 92 s 1; 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 51; 2003 c 326 s 3; 1993 c 354 s 10.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2023 c 46 ss 1, 3, 5, and 6: "Sections 1, 3, 5, and 6 of this act expire July 1, 2026." [ 2023 c 46 s 8.]

Expiration date—2023 c 46; 2022 c 158; 2019 c 92 ss 1, 5, 8, and 11: "Sections 1, 5, 8, and 11 of this act expire July 1, 2026." [ 2023 c 46 s 7; 2022 c 158 s 1; 2019 c 92 s 14.]

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.

PDFRCW 16.57.015

Livestock identification advisory committee—Rule review—Fee setting. (Effective July 1, 2026.)

(1) The director shall establish a livestock identification advisory committee. The committee shall be composed of six members appointed by the director. One member shall represent each of the following groups: Beef producers, public livestock market operators, horse owners, dairy farmers, cattle feeders, and meat processors. As used in this subsection, "meat processor" means a person licensed to operate a slaughtering establishment under chapter 16.49 RCW or the federal meat inspection act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.). In making appointments, the director shall solicit nominations from organizations representing these groups statewide. The committee shall elect a member to serve as chair of the committee.

(2) The purpose of the committee is to provide advice to the director regarding livestock identification programs administered under this chapter and regarding inspection fees and related licensing fees. The advisory committee must review the costs and operations of the livestock identification program. The director shall consult the committee before adopting, amending, or repealing a rule under this chapter or altering a fee under RCW 16.58.050, 16.65.030, 16.65.037, or 16.65.090. If the director publishes in the Washington State Register a proposed rule to be adopted under the authority of this chapter and the rule has not received the approval of the advisory committee, the director shall file with the committee a written statement setting forth the director's reasons for proposing the rule without the committee's approval.

(3) The members of the advisory committee serve three-year terms. However, the director shall by rule provide shorter initial terms for some of the members of the committee to stagger the expiration of the initial terms. The members serve without compensation. The director may authorize the expenses of a member to be reimbursed if the member is selected to attend a regional or national conference or meeting regarding livestock identification. Any such reimbursement shall be in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2023 c 46 s 2; 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 51; 2003 c 326 s 3; 1993 c 354 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 46 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026." [ 2023 c 46 s 9.]

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.